Alaska statutes. Title 35. Public Buildings, Works, and Improvements.
Article 2. Boat Harbor, Dike, Jetty, and Breakwater Facilities.

Sec. 35.10.090.
Application for federal funds.

The department shall apply in the name of the state, as applicant, to the appropriate federal agency for the construction or assistance in the construction of boat harbor, dike, jetty, or breakwater harbor facilities where the facilities are necessary, feasible, and appropriate to the local economy.

History.

(§ 1 art IV title III ch 152 SLA 1957)

Sec. 35.10.100.
Determining need and priority of projects.

The department shall prepare the preliminary determination of need for each project of the type described in AS

35.10.090

and its feasibility and appropriateness through representations and data submitted to it by the residents of each community desiring a project, and from other information available to it.
The department shall approve and make the final determination of those projects, and their order or priority for which application is made.

History.

(§ 2 art IV title III ch 152 SLA 1957)

Sec. 35.10.110.
Contracting with communities for local participation.

The department may contract with a community for the participation of the community either in the financing of projects or, instead of local financial participation, to contract with the community for its installing necessary piling, floats, and related equipment and facilities whether at the community’s direct expense or through local volunteer labor, after completion of the basic boat harbor, dike, jetty, or breakwater facilities.

History.

(§ 3 art IV title III ch 152 SLA 1957)

Sec. 35.10.120.
Lease or sale of marine or harbor facilities.

The department may lease for a period up to 50 years or may sell for a nominal sum to an incorporated city, public utility district, or other incorporated area marine or harbor facilities constructed or rebuilt with territorial funds or state funds or with territorial or state and federal matching funds.
The intent of this section is to allow cities, public utility districts, and other incorporated areas to lease or purchase marine or harbor facilities so that they may enforce municipal ordinances on them and legally assess fees to meet maintenance costs.

History.

(§ 1 ch 162 SLA 1955)